Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1109.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1102-C.2 and 1102-C.3(1) and (18)(i) and (ii) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended to read:Section 1102-C.2. Exempt Parties.--(a) The United States, the Commonwealth or any of their instrumentalities, agencies or political subdivisions, or veterans' service organizations shall be exempt from payment of the tax imposed by this article. The exemption under this section shall not, however, relieve any other party to a transaction from liability for the tax.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (b) Subsection (a) does not apply to the Pennsylvania Game Commission, the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission or the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.Section 1102-C.3. Excluded Transactions.--The tax imposed by section 1102-C shall not be imposed upon:(1) A transfer to the Commonwealth or to any of its instrumentalities, agencies or political subdivisions by gift, dedication or deed in lieu of condemnation or deed of confirmation in connection with condemnation proceedings, or a reconveyance by the condemning body of the property condemned to the owner of record at the time of condemnation, which reconveyance may include property line adjustments provided said reconveyance is made within one year from the date of condemnation. This paragraph does not apply to a transfer to the Pennsylvania Game Commission, the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission or the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.* * *(18) Any of the following:[(i) A transfer to a conservancy.](ii) A transfer from a conservancy to the United States[, the Commonwealth] or to any of [their] its instrumentalities[,] or agencies [or political subdivisions].* * *Section 2. The provisions of 61 Pa. Code Subch. I (relating to excluded parties and transactions) are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1109PN1344 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728